District of Columbia statutes.
31-3834.01

Full-year coverage for contraception.

[Applicable January 1, 2017].

Sept. 17, 2015, D.C. Law 21-21, § 2, 62 DCR 8848
Applicability of D.C. Law 21-21: Section 3 of D.C. Law 21-21 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2017.